Hawaii, session 2026, HB2189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part V, subpart B, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Direct-to-school funding transparency.  No later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session, the department shall submit to the governor, board, and legislature, a report of: (1)  The amounts and sources of any moneys allocated to department schools in the prior year, aggregated by county; and (2)  The amounts allocated in the prior year to department administration." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________